North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23.1 Environmental Quality
CHAPTER 23.1-02 Radiation

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 199, § 17, effective April 29, 2019.

23.1-02-01.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

“Department” means the department of environmental quality.

“Radiation” means gamma rays and x-rays, alpha and beta particles, high-speed electrons, neutrons, protons, and other nuclear particles; but not sound or radio waves, or visible, infrared, or ultraviolet light.

“Radiation machine” means any device that produces radiation when the associated control devices are operated.

“Radioactive material” means any material, solid, liquid, or gas, that emits radiation spontaneously.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 199, § 17, effective April 29, 2019.

23.1-02-02.
Registration agency.

The department is designated as the agency to receive registration applications and to issue certificates of registration.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 199, § 17, effective April 29, 2019.

23.1-02-03.
Registration required.

Each manufacturer, processor, and refiner of radioactive isotopes and each hospital, clinic, manufacturing establishment, research or educational institution, agricultural experiment station or center, processing mill, or other institution or place of business or process in which radiation is produced or radioactive materials are used, manufactured, processed, packaged, refined, produced, disposed, or concentrated shall register with the department. To register, each manager or officer in charge of any institution or establishment concerned with radioactive materials shall obtain a registration form from the department, complete it, and return it to the department.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 199, § 17, effective April 29, 2019.

23.1-02-04.
Certificate of registration.

Upon satisfactory completion and submission of the registration form, the department shall issue the applicant a certificate of registration. A completed registration form must provide sufficient information to determine whether the health of the public or persons working in the applicant establishment may be adversely affected by using, manufacturing, processing, packing, refining, disposing, producing, or concentrating of radioactive isotopes and materials.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 199, § 17, effective April 29, 2019.

23.1-02-05.
Penalty.

Any person required to register under section 23.1-02-03 that fails to register and obtain a certificate of registration is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 199, § 17, effective April 29, 2019.